California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(6) Residential customers have the option to not receive service pursuant to a time-of-use rate schedule and incur no additional charges as a result of the exercise of that option. Prohibited charges include, but are not limited to, administrative fees for switching away from time-of-use rates, hedging premiums that exceed any actual costs of hedging, and more than a proportional share of any discounts or other incentives paid to customers to increase participation in time-of-use rates. This prohibition on additional charges is not intended to ensure that a customer will necessarily experience a lower total bill as a result of the exercise of the option to not receive service pursuant to a time-of-use rate schedule.

(d) The commission shall not require or authorize an electrical corporation to employ default time-of-use rates for residential customers unless it has first explicitly
 considered evidence addressing the extent to which hardship will be caused on either of the following:

(1) Customers located in hot, inland areas, assuming no changes in overall usage by those customers during peak periods.

(2) Residential customers living in areas with hot summer weather, as a result of seasonal bill volatility, assuming no change in summertime usage or in usage during peak periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

746.

The commission shall determine the appropriate ratemaking treatment for incentive compensation paid to officers or employees of an electrical corporation or gas corporation for incentive compensation that is linked to the stock price or financial performance of the electrical corporation or gas corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 464, Sec. 1.   (AB 861)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

747.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission reduce rates for electricity and natural gas to the lowest amount possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 18.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

748.1.

Except for Golden State Energy, an electrical corporation or gas corporation shall not recover, through a rate approved by the commission, a fine or penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 7.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

748.2.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), an electrical corporation or gas corporation shall not recover, through a rate approved by the commission, costs arising directly from new or additional activities expressly agreed to by the
 corporation, or any direct payment, fine, or penalty paid by the corporation, in a settlement agreement resolving a criminal or civil inquiry, investigation, or prosecution for a violation of law, conducted
 by the Attorney General or a district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor, and in exchange for the inquiry, investigation, or prosecution to be terminated or concluded.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission shall only approve an electrical corporation or gas corporation to recover, through a rate, costs described in subdivision (a) if the commission determines that those costs were just and reasonably incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   (AB 2083)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

748.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Above-the-line account” means an account that contains expenses that a utility recovers from ratepayers, including an account that contains expenses that the utility used to calculate a revenue requirement request in its general rate case.

(2) “Below-the-line account” means an account that contains expenses that a utility does not generally recover from ratepayers.

(3) “Compensation” means salary, a bonus, benefits, or other consideration of any value.

(4) “Covered business unit” means a division, department, or other organizational employee group within a utility that performs activities specified in subdivision (b).

(5) “Expense” means a payment to an external entity, a cost incurred by a parent company or corporate affiliate and invoiced to a utility, and compensation paid to an employee of a utility.

(6) (A) “Political influence activity” means either of the following:

(i) An activity for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing any of the following:

(I) The adoption, repeal, or modification of federal, state,
 regional, or local legislation, regulations, or ordinances.

(II) The election, recall, appointment, or removal of a public official or the adoption of initiatives or referenda.

(III) The approval, modification, or revocation of franchises of a utility.

(IV) Public opinion with respect to legislation, regulations, ordinances, elections, referenda, or rate setting of a utility.

(V) Decisions of federal, state, regional, or local public officials.

(ii) Research, preparation, or any other activity undertaken for the purpose of supporting any activities specified in clause (i).

(B) “Political influence activity” does not include any of the following:

(i) An activity that is directly and necessarily related to appearances before regulatory or other governmental bodies in connection with the utility’s existing or proposed operations of the utility’s regulated system. Policies affecting the use of gaseous fuels or electricity are not directly and necessarily related to the utility’s existing or proposed operations.

(ii) An activity that is directly related to a commission-approved energy efficiency program or another commission-approved public purpose program if the participation of the utility has not otherwise been prohibited by the commission.

(iii) An activity that responds to a request by a legislative committee, the commission, or a government agency for technical information from the utility.

(iv) An activity required by applicable federal or state statute, or by order of a regulatory authority, and undertaken for the purpose of satisfying that statutory or regulatory requirement.

(7) (A) “Promotional advertising” means written, online, video, or audio communications that primarily build the public image of a utility and that is not required by the commission, including communications about the undergrounding of electrical lines or other actions that a utility may take in the future.

(B) “Promotional advertising” does not
 include, except as specified in subparagraph (A), any of the following:

(i) Public messages that the utility is directed to publish by a federal, state, or local agency.

(ii) Public messages that provide information on safety measures, emergency conditions,
 the conservation of energy as described in subdivision (b) of Section 796, rates, utility programs and services approved by the commission, or service interruptions, and that do not primarily build the public image of the utility.

(iii) Public messages providing necessary information to customers about specific actions the customers can take for their safety.

(8) “Public official” means a decisionmaker within an administrative agency or legislative body at the local, regional, state, or federal level, or an executive officer at the local, regional, state, or federal level.

(9) “Utility” means an electrical corporation or gas corporation.

(10) “Utility affiliate” means an entity that is related to the utility as a subsidiary, parent, or sibling corporation, including by shareholding or other means of control.

(11) “Vendor” means a person or business that provides goods and services.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a utility shall not record to an above-the-line
 account, or otherwise recover from ratepayers, direct or indirect costs of any of the following:

(1) Membership dues, sponsorships, or other contributions to an industry trade association, group, or related entity incorporated under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, if any portion of those contributions support political influence activities or advertising. This paragraph does not apply to fees for professional licenses necessary for employee job duties.

(2) Charitable giving, including contributions to an organization that qualified under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(3) Political influence activities.

(4) Promotional advertising.

(5) Payments to outside attorneys representing utilities in commission proceedings or experts testifying on behalf of, or otherwise supporting the participation by, utilities in commission proceedings that exceed the hourly rates that would be permitted for rate recovery under the commission’s intervenor compensation program.

(6) Contributions to political candidates, political parties, campaign committees, issue
 committees, or independent expenditure committees, or other political expenses.

(7) A cost, including marketing, administration, or customer service, for products or services not regulated by the commission.

(8) Penalties or fines, including tax penalties or fines, issued against a utility.

(9) Board of directors and officers liability insurance, and travel, lodging, food, or beverage expenses for a utility’s board of directors and officers or the board of directors and officers of a utility affiliate.

(10) An owned, leased, or chartered aircraft for the utility’s board of directors and officers or the board of directors and officers of a utility
 affiliate.

(11) Investor relations.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not prohibit a utility from recording to an above-the-line account payments made pursuant to an agreement authorized by the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.) or payments authorized by the federal National Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (Public Law 95-524), and does not restrict any use permitted by federal law of moneys paid pursuant to those federal acts.

(d) (1) A utility shall clearly and conspicuously disclose in all of its public messages whether the costs of the public messages are being paid for by the utility’s shareholders or ratepayers, consistent with rules and regulations related to candidate
 disclosure rules adopted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 84501) of Chapter 4 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(2) A disclosure is not clear and conspicuous if the disclosure is difficult to hear or read, or if the placement of the disclosure is easily overlooked.

(3) For public messages recorded to an above-the-line account, the utility shall identify, in response to a request from a party in the utility’s most recent general rate case, which expense or capital account is the source of the funding.

(e) (1) On or before May 31, 2026, and annually thereafter, each utility shall
 report, as part of the statement required under General Order 77-M, all of the following information from the previous calendar year to ensure the utility’s compliance with this section:

(A) (i) A list of covered business units of the utility. Except as specified in clause (ii), for each covered business unit, the report shall contain all of the following:

(I) A list of each employee’s name and job title.

(II) A job description of each listed employee sufficient to describe the employee’s responsibilities.

(III) The total annual compensation provided to each listed employee.

(IV) The number of hours booked to an above-the-line account for each listed employee.

(V) The percent of total annual compensation booked to an above-the-line account for each employee.

(ii) This subparagraph does not apply to an employee represented by a labor organization, covered under a valid collective bargaining agreement, and performing activities described in this chapter at the direction of the labor organization.

(B) To the extent the utility retains outside vendors to perform activities described in subdivision (b) and those vendors conduct any other work where the costs of the work are recorded to above-the-line accounts, the utility shall provide the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Uniform System of Accounts number under which those costs are recorded and a log documenting the time, work performed, total cost incurred, how those costs benefit ratepayers, and the reason those
 activities are not deemed to be activities for which the recovery through rates of those costs is prohibited pursuant to subdivision (b).

(C) A detailed accounting of expenses booked to an above-the-line account for participation in each commission proceeding for which the utility is a party, including employee compensation, and vendor and other expenses.

(2) The commission shall make all reports filed pursuant to paragraph (1) with the commission publicly available, consistent with Section 583.

(f) The commission shall monitor and investigate compliance and noncompliance with this section.

(g) Moving an expense to a below-the-line account after it was booked
 to an above-the-line account does not protect that expense from being disclosed to the commission or disclosed in response to a discovery request or order in a general rate case or other relevant commission proceeding.

(h) (1) In addition to any disallowance or future adjustment ordered by the commission, the commission shall assess a civil penalty, based on the severity of the violation, against a utility that violates subdivision (b) or fails or neglects to comply with any part or provision of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission implementing subdivision (b).

(2) This section does not limit the commission’s authority under any other law to assess a penalty or sanction against a utility that violates
 subdivision (b) or fails or neglects to comply with any part or provision of any order, decision, decree, rule, direction, demand, or requirement of the commission implementing subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 634, Sec. 3.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

748.5.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), the commission shall require revenues, including any accrued interest, received by an electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electric utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations to be credited directly to the
 residential customers of the electrical corporation.

(2) Small business, emissions-intensive, trade-exposed retail customers of the electrical corporation that are covered entities under the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 38562 of the Health and Safety Code, and emissions-intensive, trade-exposed retail customers of the electrical corporation that are not covered entities under the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 38562 of the Health and Safety Code, may also be credited from the revenues in paragraph (1), as determined by the commission.

(3) The credits provided to residential customers of an electrical corporation shall be provided on the bills of those customers in no more than four high-billed months of each year to maximize customer
 electric bill affordability, or as otherwise directed by the commission to address extreme, unforeseen, and temporary circumstances.

(b) (1) Not later than January 1, 2013, the commission shall require the adoption and implementation of a customer outreach plan for each electrical corporation, including, but not limited to, such measures as notices in bills and through media outlets, for purposes of obtaining the maximum feasible public awareness of the crediting of greenhouse gas allowance revenues. Costs associated with the implementation of this plan are subject to recovery in rates pursuant to Section 454.

(2) Not later than January 1, 2027,
 the commission shall require each electrical corporation to update the customer outreach plan developed pursuant to paragraph (1) to include a statement at the top of customer bills in applicable months specifying the amount of money saved on a utility bill in that month and attributing those savings to the climate credit and the California Cap-and-Invest Program.

(c) The commission may allocate up to 15 percent of the revenues, including any accrued interest, received by an electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electrical distribution utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, for clean energy and energy efficiency projects established pursuant to statute that are administered by the electrical corporation, or a qualified third-party administrator as approved by the commission, and that are not otherwise
 funded by another funding source.
 This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026.

(d) (1) The commission shall require an electrical corporation to annually remit to the State Treasury 5 percent of the revenues, including any accrued interest, received by the electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electrical distribution utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations for deposit in the California Transmission Accelerator Revolving Fund, pursuant to Section 63049.72 of the Government Code. This paragraph shall become operative on July 1, 2026, and shall become inoperative on July 1, 2031.

(2) The revenues deposited in the fund shall be available to
 the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank for purposes of the California Transmission Accelerator Revolving Fund Program established pursuant to Sections 63049.71 to 63049.73, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 117, Sec. 13.   (AB 1207)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

748.5.5.

(a) A local publicly owned electric utility that receives an allowance allocation in addition to the allowance totals specified in Section 95892 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 38562 of the Health and Safety Code shall provide a credit in an amount equal to the total value of that additional allocation directly to ratepayers. This section does not limit the acceptable uses, as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 95892 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, of other allowances allocated to local publicly owned electric utilities.

(b) A local publicly owned electric utility shall report to the State Air Resources
 Board on the uses of all revenues, including any accrued interest, received by that local publicly owned electric utility as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electric utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the State Air Resources Board shall annually submit a report to the Legislature on the uses of revenues specified in subdivision (b) in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 117, Sec. 14.   (AB 1207)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

748.6.

Beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2019, and ending with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, the commission shall annually allocate fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) of the revenues, including any accrued interest, received by a gas corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas emissions allowances provided to gas corporations as part of a market-based compliance mechanism adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 38562 of the Health and Safety Code to fund the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development (BUILD) Program (Article 12 (commencing with Section 921)) and the Technology and Equipment for Clean Heating (TECH) Initiative (Article 13 (commencing with Section 922)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 241.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

749.

Public utilities shall develop programs in cooperation with local school districts in reducing their electricity and gas bills through conservation and improvements in efficiency. Utilities may offer to school districts on a priority basis, and school districts may utilize, any programs or incentives for commercial customers developed by the utility and approved by the commission, including rebates, loan programs and incentives for the installation of efficient lighting, heating, or cooling systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1178, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

749.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “public school” means a public school, including a charter school, maintaining a kindergarten, or any of the grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The commission shall, as part of its ratesetting process, direct each electrical and gas corporation to evaluate and report findings to the commission, by January 1, 2020, on the feasibility and economic impact of establishing public school electric and gas rates that would reflect a discount from the current rate structure. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Commercial rate increases in the past five years that affected public schools within the service territory of each
 electrical and gas corporation.

(2) Economic impact to all ratepayers if all public schools within the service territory received a discount from the current rate structure.

(3) The impact of planned modifications to the time intervals reflected in time-of-use rates and to rate design elements, as adopted by the commission and in the planning stages or proposed by electric and gas corporations.

(4) The cost shifts that would occur, if any, and to which consumers the costs would shift, as a result of a discounted rate for public schools.

(c) The commission shall compile the reports required in subdivision (b) and submit the compilation to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2020, in compliance with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

750.

The commission shall develop formal procedures to consider safety in a rate case application by an electrical corporation or gas corporation. The procedures shall include a means by which safety information acquired by the commission through monitoring, data tracking and analysis, accident investigations, and audits of an applicant’s safety programs may inform the commission’s consideration of the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   (SB 900)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

(a) This section applies only to those public utilities over which the commission exercises its authority to fix rates and only to the extent the revenue requirements of the utility were based upon the tax rates in effect at the time rates were fixed for the utility by the commission. This section does not limit the discretionary authority of the commission to adjust any incentives provided pursuant to any state supervised or administered program, including the state’s telecommunications universal service programs administered pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 270).

(b) The commission shall evaluate the full effect of the enactment of federal House
 Resolution 1 (Public Law 115-97) upon the expenses and tax liabilities incurred by public utilities for payment of federal taxes. If the commission determines that the projected expenses and tax liabilities for federal taxes that the commission has authorized in the rates for a public utility are materially affected by the enactment of federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 115-97), the commission shall adjust the rates of the utility to reflect the changes in projected expenses and tax liabilities in light of the changes in federal law. This section does not limit the discretionary authority of the commission to determine the full effect of the changes in federal tax law on each utility’s cost of
 service, to utilize appropriate mechanisms at its disposal to track changes and adjust rates accordingly, and to allocate the impacts from changes in federal tax law over the period of time that results in the most reasonable allocation based on the particular circumstances of each utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 411, Sec. 1.   (SB 1028)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

755.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) An electrical, gas, or water corporation that offers customers credit card or debit card payment options, may recover the reasonable expenses incurred by the electrical, gas, or water corporation for providing the customers the option of paying their bills by credit card or debit card.

(2) Only the customers that choose to use these payment options incur the additional
 charge and that no portion of the expense is shifted to customers that do not choose to pay a bill by credit card or debit card, unless and until the commission determines that the savings to ratepayers exceeds the net cost of accepting those cards.

(3) The acceptance of credit cards or debit cards neither increases nor decreases the profitability of the electrical, gas, or water corporation.

(b) An electrical, gas, or water corporation may offer credit card and debit card bill payment options, if approved by the commission. The electrical, gas, or water corporation may recover reasonable transaction costs incurred by the electrical, gas, or water corporation only from those customers that choose to pay by those payment options.

(c) The commission shall determine through existing regulatory mechanisms the
 reasonableness of transaction costs charged to customers that choose to pay an electrical, gas, or water corporation by a credit card or debit card bill payment option pursuant to this section. The commission shall determine how any associated costs or potential savings as a result of those customers paying by the credit card or debit card payment option shall be passed on to electrical, gas, or water corporation customers. In determining how these savings or costs are passed on to customers, the commission shall do the following:

(1) The transaction costs that are passed on to customers pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be offset by any savings in transaction costs the electrical, gas, or water corporation derives as a result of those customers paying by credit card and debit card.

(2) If the commission determines that the use of credit cards and debit cards results in no net
 cost to the electrical, gas, or water corporation, there shall be no individual customer transaction fee as provided for in subdivision (b).

(3) If the commission determines that the savings to the electrical, gas, or water corporation exceeds the costs to the electrical, gas, or water corporation, the net savings shall be passed on to electrical, gas, or water corporation customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

755.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 755, the commission shall allow a water corporation with 10,000 or more service connections to recover the reasonable expenses incurred by the water corporation in providing to its customers bill payment options, including credit card, debit card, and prepaid card bill payment options, and shall not require the water corporation to impose a transaction fee on its customers.

(b) The costs of the
 bill payment options undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be recovered from customers participating in a water rate relief program for low-income ratepayers established pursuant to Section 739.8.

(c) The commission shall ensure that accepting bill payment options pursuant to subdivision (a) neither increases nor decreases the rate of return of the water corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

758.

(a) The commission shall allow an electrical corporation to recover in rates amounts assessed to the utility pursuant to Section 8610.5 of the Government Code.

(b) The commission shall ensure that any moneys refunded to an electrical corporation from the Nuclear Planning Assessment Special Account pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 8610.5 of the Government Code are credited to ratepayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 492, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Equipment, Practices, and Facilities [761. - 788.]

761.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing, finds that the rules, practices, equipment, appliances, facilities, or service of any public utility, or the methods of manufacture, distribution, transmission, storage, or supply employed by it, are unjust, unreasonable, unsafe, improper, inadequate, or insufficient, the commission shall determine and, by order or rule, fix the rules, practices, equipment, appliances, facilities, service, or methods to be observed, furnished, constructed, enforced, or employed. The commission shall prescribe rules for the performance of any service or the furnishing of any commodity of the character furnished or supplied by any public utility, and, on
 proper demand and tender of rates, such public utility shall furnish such commodity or render such service within the time and upon the conditions provided in such rules.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

761.3.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 216 and subdivision (c) of Section 218.5, the commission shall implement and enforce standards for the maintenance and operation of facilities for the generation and storage of electricity owned by an electrical corporation or located in the state to ensure their reliable operation. The commission shall enforce the protocols for the scheduling of powerplant outages of the Independent System Operator.

(b) This section does not authorize the commission to establish rates for wholesale sales in interstate commerce from those facilities, or to approve the sale or transfer of control of facilities if an exempt wholesale generator, as defined
 in the federal Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 16451(6)).

(c) (1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, this section does not apply to nuclear powered generating facilities that are federally regulated and subject to standards developed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission and that participate as members of the Institute of Nuclear Power Operations.

(B) The owner or operator of a nuclear powered generating facility shall file with the commission an annual schedule of maintenance, including repairs and upgrades, updated quarterly, for each generating facility. The owner or operator of a nuclear powered generating facility shall make good faith efforts to conduct its maintenance in compliance with its filed
 plan and shall report to the Independent System Operator any significant variations from its filed plan.

(C) The owner or operator of a nuclear powered generating facility shall report on a monthly basis to the commission all actual planned and unplanned outages of each facility during the preceding month. The owner or operator of a nuclear powered generating facility shall report on a daily basis to the Independent System Operator the daily operational status and availability of each facility.

(2) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, this section does not apply to a qualifying small power production facility or a qualifying cogeneration facility within the meaning of Sections 201 and 210 of Title 11 of the federal Public Utility Regulatory
 Policies Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Secs. 796(17), 796(18), and 824a-3), and the regulations adopted pursuant to those sections by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (18 C.F.R. Secs. 292.101 to 292.602, inclusive), nor does this section apply to other generation units installed, operated, and maintained at a customer site exclusively to serve that customer’s load.

(B) An electrical corporation that has a contract with a qualifying small power production facility, or a qualifying cogeneration facility, with a name plate rating of 10 megawatts or greater, shall report to the commission maintenance schedules for each facility, including all actual planned and unplanned outages of the facility and the daily operational status and availability of the facility. Each facility with a name plate rating of 10 megawatts or greater shall be
 responsible for directly reporting to the Independent System Operator maintenance schedules for each facility, including all actual planned and unplanned outages of the facility and the daily operational status and availability of the facility, if that information is not provided to the electrical corporation pursuant to a contract.

(d) This section shall not result in the modification, delay, or abrogation of any deadline, standard, rule, or regulation adopted by a federal, state, or local agency for the purposes of protecting public health or the environment, including, but not limited to, any requirements imposed by the State Air Resources Board or by an air pollution control district or an air quality management district pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 39000) of the Health and Safety Code. The Independent System Operator shall consult
 with the State Air Resources Board and the appropriate local air pollution control districts and air quality management districts to coordinate scheduled outages to provide for compliance with those retrofits.

(e) The Independent System Operator shall maintain records of generation and storage facility outages and shall provide those records to the commission on a daily basis. Each entity that owns or operates an electric generating unit in California with a rated maximum capacity of 10 megawatts or greater shall provide a monthly report to the Independent System Operator that identifies any periods during the preceding month when the unit was unavailable to produce electricity or was available only at reduced capacity. The report shall identify the reasons for any such unscheduled unavailability or reduced capacity. The Independent System
 Operator shall immediately transmit the information to the commission.

(f) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A facility owned by a local publicly owned electric utility.

(2) A public agency that may generate electricity incidental to the provision of water or wastewater treatment.

(3) A facility owned by a city and county operating as a public
 utility, furnishing electric service as provided in Section 10001.

(g) (1) In order to ensure the safety of employees, emergency responders, and surrounding communities, each battery energy storage facility located in the state and subject to subdivision (a) shall have an emergency response and emergency action plan that covers the
 premises of the battery energy storage facility, consistent with Sections 142.3 and 6401 of the Labor Code and any related regulations, including the regulatory requirements applicable to emergency action plans pursuant to Section 3220 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The emergency response and emergency action plan shall do all of the following:

(A) Establish response procedures for an equipment malfunction or failure.

(B) Include procedures that provide for the safety of surrounding residents, neighboring
 properties, emergency responders, and the environment. These procedures shall be established in consultation with local emergency management agencies.

(C) Establish notification and communication procedures between the battery energy storage facility and local emergency management agencies.

(3) The emergency response and emergency action plan may do all of the following:

(A) Consider responses to potential offsite impacts, including, but not limited to, poor air quality, threats to municipal water supplies, water runoff, and threats to
 natural waterways.

(B) Include procedures for the local emergency response agency to establish shelter-in-place orders and road closure notifications when appropriate.

(4) In developing the emergency response and
 emergency action plan,
 the owner or operator of the battery energy storage facility shall coordinate with local emergency management agencies, unified program agencies, and local first response agencies.

(5) The owner or operator of each battery energy storage facility shall submit the emergency response and emergency action plan to the
 county and, if applicable, the city where the facility is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 377, Sec. 1.   (SB 38)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

761.5.

(a) Where the commission determines that it would be cost-effective, the commission shall authorize electrical and gas corporations to participate in a centralized credit check system to share information on customers; and the electrical and gas corporations may also share information on customers with telephone corporations and publicly owned public utilities. No public utility which participates in the centralized credit check system shall utilize any information obtained through the database for its internal
 marketing purposes. A public utility may release pertinent information to a collection agency for the purpose of collecting an outstanding bill, but shall not otherwise release, transfer, or sell any information obtained through the centralized credit check system.

(b) Every electrical and gas corporation which participates in a centralized credit check system is subject to the Consumer Credit Reporting Agencies Act (Title 1.6 (commencing with Section 1785.1) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1066, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

762.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing, finds that additions, extensions, repairs, or improvements to, or changes in, the existing plant, equipment, apparatus, facilities, or other physical property of any public utility or of any two or more public utilities ought reasonably to be made, or that new structures should be erected, to promote the security or convenience of its employees or the public, or in any other way to secure adequate service or facilities, the commission shall make and serve an order directing that such additions, extensions, repairs, improvements, or changes be made or such structures be erected in the manner and within the time specified in the order. If